New Jersey, session 222, S3579.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    A school district employee, other than a teaching staff member, who is hired on or after the effective date of this act and who, after July 1, 1940, has served or hereafter shall serve, in the active military or naval service of the United States or of this State, including active service in the women's army corps, the women's reserve of the naval reserve, or any similar organization authorized by the United States to serve with the army or navy, in time of war or an emergency, or for or during any period of training, or pursuant to or in connection with the operation of any system of selective service, shall be entitled to receive equivalent years of employment credit for such service as if he had been employed for the same period of time in the school district, except that the period of such service shall not be credited toward more than four employment or adjustment increments. Nothing contained in this section shall be construed to reduce the number of employment or adjustment increments to which an employee may be entitled under the terms of any law, or regulation, or action of any employing board or officer, of this State, relating to leaves of absence. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately. STATEMENT N.J.S.18A:29-11 provides that teaching staff members are entitled to military service credit for compensation purposes, provided that the period of the service cannot be credited toward more than four employment or adjustment increments.  This bill will provide the same military service credit to employees of school districts who are not teaching staff members and will apply to those employees who are hired on or after the effective date of the bill. A teaching staff member is defined at N.J.S.18A:1-1 as a member of the professional staff of any district or regional board of education, or any board of education of a county vocational school, holding office, position or employment of such character that the qualifications, for such office, position or employment, require him to hold a valid and effective standard, provisional or emergency certificate, appropriate to his office, position or employment, issued by the State Board of Examiners and includes a school nurse and a school athletic trainer.